New York, session 2025-2026, A11402.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 2 66-i to read as follows: 3 § 66-i. Long-duration energy storage procurement target. 1. Legisla- 4 tive findings and declaration. The legislature finds and declares that: 5 (a) Long-duration energy storage ("LDES") is critical to enabling 6 affordability for ratepayers, maintaining grid reliability, reducing 7 system-wide costs, strengthening energy independence and economic devel- 8 opment, supporting resilience to extreme weather events, and integrating 9 renewable resources. 10 (b) Achieving the state's clean energy goals at least cost, including 11 one hundred percent zero-emission electricity by two thousand forty, 12 requires deployment of a portfolio of energy storage technologies of 13 different durations. 14 (c) A statewide procurement target for LDES will provide regulatory 15 certainty, encourage investment, and support the economic development of 16 technologies that enable reliable, low-cost power. 17 2. Definitions. As used in this section, the following terms shall 18 have the following meanings: 19 (a) "Long-duration energy storage" or "LDES" shall mean any energy 20 storage system capable of storing and discharging electricity for ten or 21 more hours at nameplate capacity, including both inter-day LDES and 22 multi-day LDES. 23 (b) "Inter-day LDES" shall mean any energy storage system capable of 24 storing and discharging electricity for a duration between ten and twen- 25 ty-four hours at nameplate capacity. 26 (c) "Multi-day LDES" shall mean any energy storage system capable of 27 storing and discharging electricity for twenty-four or more hours at 28 nameplate capacity. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15809-01-6 A. 11402 2 1 (d) "Procurement target" shall mean the amount of incremental long-du- 2 ration energy storage capacity contracted by the authority pursuant to 3 this section. 4 (e) "Authority" shall mean the New York state energy research and 5 development authority. 6 3. Long-duration energy storage procurement target. (a) By December 7 thirty-first, two thousand thirty, the authority shall contract at least 8 three thousand megawatts of incremental long-duration energy storage 9 capacity, including at least one thousand five hundred megawatts of 10 inter-day LDES and at least one thousand five hundred megawatts of 11 multi-day LDES. 12 (b) No later than July first, two thousand twenty-seven, the commis- 13 sion, in consultation with the authority, shall publish an LDES roadmap 14 that establishes a plan and timeline to achieve the procurement target 15 established pursuant to this section. Such roadmap shall describe, but 16 shall not be limited to, competitive solicitations, incentive programs, 17 or other procurement mechanisms to achieve the procurement target, and 18 coordinate strategies with relevant agencies to ensure timely permitting 19 and interconnection to achieve the procurement target. 20 (c) The commission shall adopt one or more procurement programs to 21 achieve the procurement target and ensure such program or programs 22 commence no later than July first, two thousand twenty-eight. 23 (d) The procurement target shall not limit any additional LDES deploy- 24 ment beyond the required three thousand megawatts. 25 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.